Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,122
Traffic control devices; when illegal to sell or lease.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, lease, or offer for sale or lease any traffic control devices which are not in compliance with the manual.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-613;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 218.